Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Part 1 Gypsy and Brown-Tail Moths

2-17-1.
Nuisances.

The pupae, nests, eggs and caterpillars of the gypsy and brown-tail moths, and these moths, are declared public nuisances, and their suppression is authorized and required. No owner or occupant of an estate infested with those nuisances shall by reason
of this infestation be liable to an action, civil or criminal, except to the extent and in the manner and form set forth in this part 1.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-1

.

2-17-2.
Chief entomologist.

The director of environmental management shall appoint, as chief entomologist, some person, qualified by scientific training and practical experience, to superintend the work of suppressing and exterminating the gypsy and brown-tail moths, who is responsible
to the director for the performance of his or her work and whose duty it is to suppress the nuisances described in §

2-17-1

. The director may remove the chief entomologist at any time, at his or her pleasure, and appoint another chief entomologist in his or her place. The chief entomologist shall report to the director of his or her proceedings,
and that report shall be public.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-2

.

2-17-3.
Powers of director.

The director of environmental management may make all necessary rules and regulations governing all work done by the chief entomologist to enforce the provision of §§

2-17-1

—

2-17-8

. The director may act in cooperation with any person or persons, corporation or corporations, including other states, the United States or foreign governments. The director may conduct investigations and accumulate and
distribute information concerning these moths, may make any rules governing the suppression or extermination of these moths that he or she deems necessary, and, with the approval of the person in charge, may use any real or personal
property of the state, may at all times enter upon the land of the state or of a municipality, corporation, or other owner or owners, and may use all reasonable means in carrying out the purposes of §§

2-17-1

—

2-17-8

and in these undertakings may, in accordance with the provisions of §§ 2-17-1 — 2-17-8 expend the funds appropriated or donated for these purpose.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-3

.

2-17-4.
Appropriations and expenses.

To meet the expenses incurred under the authority of §§

2-17-1

—

2-17-8

there shall be allowed and paid out of the treasury of the state any sum that the general assembly may annually appropriate, to be expended under the direction of the director of environmental management, from time to
time, upon vouchers approved by the director.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-4

.

2-17-5.
Importation or transportation of infestation.

No imagos, eggs, caterpillars, or pupae of the gypsy or brown-tail moths, and no lumber (new or old), wood, posts, shrubs, trees, or branches, stone or rubbish, nor any material which by reason of having been exposed to infestation is liable to carry
the live eggs, imagos, caterpillars, or pupae of the moths, shall knowingly be imported into the state, nor be transported from place to place within the state.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-5

.

2-17-6.
Local appropriations.

Any town or city may make any appropriation that it deems necessary for the suppression of the nuisances within its limits, and may appoint an official, with any powers and limitations that it shall prescribe, to expend the appropriation in cooperation
with the chief entomologist appointed by the director of environmental management.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-6

.

2-17-7.
Obstructions — Violations.

Any person who wilfully resists or obstructs either the chief entomologist or any official of a city or town, or a servant or agent appointed by the chief entomologist or by any other officials, while lawfully engaged in the execution of the purposes
of §§

2-17-1

—

2-17-8

or who violates the provisions of §

2-17-5

, is deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-7

.

2-17-8.
Willful transportation of infestation.

Any person willfully importing into this state, or willfully transporting from place to place within this state, any imagos, eggs, caterpillars, or pupae of the moths shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) and be imprisoned for not more
than one year.

History of Section. P.L. 1908, ch. 1529, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 242, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 285, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 228, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-8

.